Maine, session 132, LD1474.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §14 is enacted to read:
§14. Wabanaki studies specialist
The Wabanaki studies specialist, referred to in this section as "the specialist," is
established in the department to ensure the inclusion of Wabanaki studies in the parameters
for essential instruction and graduation requirements as required by section 4706,
subsection 4.
1. Duties. The specialist, in consultation with the contracted Wabanaki advisors, shall:
A. Assist school administrative units and educators in the exploration of a wide range
of educational materials and resources relating to Wabanaki studies;
B. Identify materials and resources for implementing the instruction of Wabanaki
studies;
C. Involve organizations and individuals able and willing to assist with the
requirements under this subsection, including, but not limited to, museums and
educators; and
D. Make recommendations to the department regarding:
(1) Wabanaki studies curricula;
(2) Wabanaki studies courses that count toward the requirements of teacher
certification; and
(3) Implementation of teacher education programs and summer teacher institutes.
2. Reporting. The specialist shall annually report to the commissioner and the Maine
Indian Tribal-State Commission regarding the implementation of the instruction of
Wabanaki studies as required by section 4706, subsection 4 and regarding:
A. Educational materials and resources that are appropriate to assist school
administrative units and educators in the State to include Wabanaki studies as required
by section 4706, subsection 4; and
Page 1 - 132LR2162(05)

B. Opportunities for professional development, training and technical assistance that
must be provided to assist school administrative units and educators in the State in
implementing Wabanaki studies as required by section 4706, subsection 4.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §4706, first ¶, as amended by PL 2021, c. 247, §1 and affected
by §3, is further amended to read:
Instruction in American history, African American studies, government, citizenship,
Maine studies and, the history of genocide and Wabanaki studies must be aligned with the
parameters for essential instruction and graduation requirements established under section
6209.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §4706, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 537, §2, is further
amended to read:
2. Maine studies. Maine history, including the Constitution of Maine, Maine
geography and environment and the natural, industrial and economic resources of Maine
and Maine's cultural and ethnic heritage, must be taught. A required component of Maine
studies is Wabanaki studies, and Wabanaki studies may be taught as a component of other
content areas, as appropriate, including but not limited to the content areas of English
language arts, mathematics, science and fine arts. Wabanaki studies and Maine African
American studies must be included in the review of content standards and performance
indicators of the learning results conducted in accordance with section 6209, subsection 4.
Wabanaki studies must address the following topics:
A. Wabanaki governments and political systems and their relationship with local, state,
national and international governments;
B. Wabanaki cultural systems and the experience of tribal people throughout history;
C. Wabanaki territories; and
D. Wabanaki economic systems.
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §4706, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Wabanaki studies. Wabanaki studies must be included in the review of content
standards and performance indicators of the learning results conducted in accordance with
section 6209, subsection 4. Wabanaki studies may include social studies, English language
arts, mathematics, science and fine arts in accordance with this subsection. Wabanaki
studies must address the following topics:
A. Tribal governments in the State and political systems and their relationship with
local, state, national and international governments;
B. Wabanaki cultural systems and the experience of tribal people in the State
throughout history;
C. Wabanaki territories;
D. Wabanaki economic systems; and
E. Other curricula recommended by the Wabanaki studies specialist pursuant to
section 14.
Beginning July 1, 2027, the department shall, in a representative sample of schools, no less
than biannually study the Wabanaki studies curricula under this subsection to assess its
Page 2 - 132LR2162(05)

implementation. The department shall publish its findings on the department's publicly
accessible website.
Sec. 5. 20-A MRSA §13011, sub-§11 is enacted to read:
11. Wabanaki studies requirement. The state board may adopt rules to require the
completion of a Wabanaki studies component in the qualifications for certifying teachers
in accordance with sections 13012‑A and 13013.
Sec. 6. State Board of Education to evaluate rules. The State Board of
Education shall, no later than July 1, 2027, evaluate whether the adoption of rules requiring
the completion of a Wabanaki studies component in the qualifications for certifying
teachers is necessary.
Sec. 7. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Office of Workforce Development and Innovative Pathways Z334
Initiative: Provides one-time funds for a contracted review team to study the Wabanaki
studies curricula to assess its implementation.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $50,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $50,000
Office of Workforce Development and Innovative Pathways Z334
Initiative: Provides one-time funds to support the contracted Wabanaki advisors and for
professional development, training and technical assistance.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $50,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $50,000
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $100,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $100,000
Page 3 - 132LR2162(05)